test/src/morphology/V-riqddw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ri’ddõ: # Verb 33 'eng /est koristada/fin' - full paradigm
     ri’ddõ+V+Inf: ri’ddõ
     ri’ddõ+V+Ger: ri’ddõs
     ri’ddõ+V+Sup: ri’ddõm
     ri’ddõ+V+Sup+Ine: ri’ddõmõs
     ri’ddõ+V+Sup+Ela: ri’ddõmõst
     ri’ddõ+V+Sup+Tra: ri’ddõmõks
     ri’ddõ+V+Sup+Abe: ri’ddõmõt
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ridūb
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ri’ddõt
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ridūbõd
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ridīz
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ridīzt, ridīztõ]
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ridīzt, ridīztõ]
     ri’ddõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ri’d
     ri’ddõ+V+Cond+Sg3: ri’ddõks
     ri’ddõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ri’d
     ri’ddõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ri’d
     ri’ddõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ri’ddõgid
     ri’ddõ+V+Jus+Sg3: ri’ddõg
     ri’ddõ+V+Quo+Sg3: ri’ddiji
     ri’ddõ+V+ActPrfPrc: ri’ddõn
     ri’ddõ+V+PssPrfPrc: ri’dtõd
